Idaho, session 2026, H0572.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 10, Title 32, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 32-1016, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
32-1016. PEDIATRIC SECRETIVE TRANSITIONS PARENTAL RIGHTS ACT. (1)
This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Pediatric Secretive
Transitions Parental Rights Act."
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) Parents have a fundamental right to raise their children and make
medical and educational decisions on their behalf;
(b) Medical and social sex transitions can inflict severe and irre-
versible harm to a child's well-being; and
(c) It is undoubtedly a parental purview and prerogative to have knowl-
edge of, and the authority to deny, a child's efforts at sex transition
procedures or social transitions.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to prohibit any health care
provider, educational institution, or mandated reporter of child neglect
or abuse from facilitating a pediatric sex transition or social transition
without informing and obtaining informed consent from a minor child's par-
ents or guardians.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Aggrieved person" means the parent or guardian of a child sub-
jected to social transition or sex transition procedures.
(b) "Child" means an individual who is less than eighteen (18) years of
age and who is not married or legally emancipated.
(c) "Covered entity" means a mandated reporter of child abuse or
neglect pursuant to state law, a primary or secondary educational in-
stitution, a child care provider, or a medical, behavioral, or mental
health care provider.
(d)(i) "Sex transition procedure" means engaging in any one (1)
or more of the following for the purpose of: (i) intentionally de-
laying, halting, or disrupting the natural development of an in-
dividual's body, including the onset or progression of puberty, so
that it does not develop or halts developing to correspond to the


individual's sex; or (ii) intentionally changing an individual's
body, including the individual's external appearance or biologi-
cal functions, to no longer correspond to the individual's sex:
1. The use of puberty blockers, including gonadotropin re-
leasing hormone agonists and antagonists;
2. The use of sex hormones, such as androgen blockers, es-
trogen, anti-estrogen, progesterone, testosterone, or di-
hydrotestosterone blockers; or
3. Surgical procedures that attempt to transform an indi-
vidual's physical appearance or that attempt to alter or re-
move an individual's sexual organs.
(ii) "Sex transition procedure" does not include:
1. Appropriate and medically necessary procedures to treat
a verifiable disorder of sexual development, including an
individual born with forty-six (46) XX chromosomes with vir-
ilization, an individual born with forty-six (46) XY chromo-
somes with undervirilization, or an individual having both
ovarian and testicular tissue;
2. The treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or dis-
order that has been caused or exacerbated by the performance
of an intervention described in paragraph (d)(i) of this
section without regard to whether the intervention was per-
formed in accordance with state or federal law; or
3. Any intervention undertaken because an individual suf-
fers from any diagnosed and verifiable condition of the
body's organ systems, including traumatic bodily injuries,
congenital structural anomalies of major organs or systems,
or acute illnesses with a high probability of rapid mortal-
ity.
(e) "Social transition" means the nonmedical process by which an in-
dividual adopts a name, pronouns, appearance, or mannerisms associated
with a gender other than from such individual's biological sex.
(5) A covered entity shall not withhold information from a child's par-
ent or guardian related to the parent's child's expressed interest in or de-
sire for sex transition procedures.
(6) A covered entity shall not facilitate or contribute to a child's ef-
forts to obtain sex transition procedures without the express written con-
sent of such child's parent or guardian.
(7) An aggrieved person may commence an action at law or equity in a
court of competent jurisdiction against a covered entity for violations of
this section.
(8) If an aggrieved person proves that a covered entity violated the
provisions of this section, such aggrieved person is entitled to recover:
(a) Declaratory relief;
(b) Injunctive relief;
(c) Statutory damages of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)
assessed against the covered entity found by a court or jury to have vio-
lated this section;
(d) Compensatory damages; and
(e) Reasonable costs and attorney's fees.


(9) The attorney general shall have the authority to investigate alle-
gations of violations of this section.
(10) In addition to any relief granted to aggrieved persons under a
civil action, the attorney general may seek civil penalties of up to one hun-
dred thousand dollars ($100,000) against a covered entity for violation of
this section. Such civil penalties shall be deposited in the state general
fund.
(11) The attorney general may file suit for a writ of mandamus com-
pelling covered entities to comply with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.